New York, session 2025-2026, S3172.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 23 of the judiciary law, as added by chapter 649 of 2 the laws of 1945, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 23. Age limitation on term of judicial office. No person shall hold 4 the office of judge of the court of appeals, justice [or surrogate of 5 any court, whether of record or not of record, except a justice of the 6 peace of a town or police justice of a village,] of the supreme court, 7 judge of the court of claims, judge of the county court, judge of the 8 surrogate's court, judge of the family court, judge of a court for the 9 city of New York established pursuant to section fifteen of article VI 10 of the state constitution or judge of the district court longer than 11 until and including the last day of December next after [he shall be] 12 turning seventy years of age[, except that a judge or justice in office 13 or elected or appointed to office at the effective date of this section, 14 as to whom no provision limiting his right to hold office to the close 15 of the year following his attaining the age of seventy years was appli- 16 cable prior to the effective date of this section, may continue in 17 office during the term for which he was elected or appointed]. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06605-01-5